Louisiana, session 2026, SB85.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5554.15 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5554.15. St. Charles Parish; payment of group insurance premiums; retired
sheriffs and deputy sheriffs; creation of fund
A. There is hereby created the St. Charles Parish Sheriff Retired
Employees Insurance Fund, hereinafter referred to as the "SCREIF", to help
offset the payment by the sheriff's office of St. Charles Parish of the premium
costs for eligible retired sheriffs and retired deputy sheriffs as provided in R.S.
13:5554(O).
B. The sheriff of St. Charles Parish may contribute to the SCREIF at his
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 85 ENROLLED
discretion.
C. Upon recommendations of the board established in Subsection F of
this Section, the sheriff of St. Charles Parish shall invest at least twenty-five
percent in equities and twenty-five percent in fixed income investments into the
SCREIF, provided that a minimum of seventy-five percent of the fixed income
portion is rated as investment grade by a nationally recognized rating agency.
D.(1) The earnings realized on the monies invested pursuant to
Subsection C of this Section shall be available for the sheriff to withdraw for the
sole purpose of paying the insurance premium costs provided in R.S. 13:5554(O)
for retired sheriffs and retired deputy sheriffs of St. Charles Parish, legal
representation costs for the SCREIF Board, or both, provided that no such
earnings shall be withdrawn until the amount of principal and accumulated
earnings in the SCREIF are equal to the sum of four million dollars.
(2) In the event that the total amount of monies derived from deposits
provided in Subsection B of this Section and investment earnings fall below the
sum of four million dollars, no earnings shall be withdrawn, and any balance
owed for the payment of insurance premium costs as required by R.S.
13:5554(O) or legal representation costs for the SCREIF Board shall be paid in
full from the sheriff's general fund.
E. Any financial audit conducted of the sheriff's office of St. Charles
Parish shall specifically address compliance with the provisions of this Section.
F.(1) To provide recommendations concerning the investment of funds
as provided in Subsection C of this Section, the sheriff shall establish the
SCREIF Board as an investment advisory board consisting of three members
as follows:
(a) The sheriff or his designee.
(b) One retired sheriff or retired deputy sheriff of the department,
appointed by the sheriff, who shall serve a term determined by the sheriff.
(c) One active deputy sheriff of the department, appointed by the sheriff,
who shall serve a term determined by the sheriff.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 85 ENROLLED
(2) The members of the board shall elect a chairperson at its first board
meeting, which shall be held within thirty days after the appointment of board
members.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.